Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-1004
Designation of jurisdiction; how described.

An ordinance of a city of the second class or village designating its jurisdiction over territory outside of the corporate limits of the city or village under section 17-1001 or 17-1002 shall describe such territory by metes and bounds or by reference to an official map.

Laws 1993, LB 208, § 4.